Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.120

Unauthorized abortions—Penalty.

Unless authorized by RCW 9.02.110, any person who performs an abortion on another person shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The state shall not penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against an individual based on their actual, potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy outcomes. Nor shall the state penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against someone for aiding or assisting a pregnant individual in exercising their right to reproductive freedom with their voluntary consent.

[ 2022 c 65 s 8; 1992 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.